District of Columbia statutes.
38-2321

Repealed

Authorization of appropriations.

Repealed.

Oct. 15, 1966, 80 Stat. 1027, Pub. L. 89-694, § 2
Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 1790, Pub. L. 99-371, § 410
1981 Ed., § 31-1821.
1973 Ed., § 31-1051.